Wisconsin, session 2025, SB849.
do enact as follows:SB849,11Section 1. 893.586 of the statutes is created to read:SB849,2,42893.586 Trafficking of a child; limitation. An action under s. 895.439 (2) 3for damages shall be commenced before the injured party reaches the age of 35 4years or be barred.SB849,25Section 2. 895.439 (title) of the statutes is created to read:SB849,2,66895.439 (title) Trafficking, action for.SB849,37Section 3. 895.439 (1) (title) of the statutes is created to read:SB849,2,88895.439 (1) (title) Human trafficking.SB849,49Section 4. 895.439 (2) (title) of the statutes is created to read:SB849,2,1010895.439 (2) (title) Trafficking of a child.SB849,511Section 5. 940.302 (3) of the statutes is renumbered 895.439 (1) and 12amended to read:SB849,2,1713895.439 (1) Any person who incurs an injury or death as a result of a violation 14of sub. s. 940.302 (2) may bring a civil action against the person who committed the 15violation. In addition to actual damages, the court may award punitive damages to 16the injured party, not to exceed treble the amount of actual damages incurred, and 17reasonable attorney fees.SB849,618Section 6. 948.051 (3) of the statutes is renumbered 895.439 (2) and 19amended to read:SB849,3,420895.439 (2) Any person who incurs an injury or death as a result of a violation 21of sub. (1) or (2) s. 948.051 may bring a civil action against the person who 22committed the violation. An action may be brought under this subsection 1regardless of whether anyone was prosecuted or convicted for the violation. In 2addition to actual damages, the court may award punitive damages to the injured 3party, not to exceed treble the amount of actual damages incurred, and reasonable 4attorney fees.SB849,3,55